src/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM !!= @CODE@ Loan adjectives from norwegian/swedish (Not adjectives ending on -isk). Words like demonstrativ, transitiv, dupleks, informativ, analog, privat. Gives both "demonstratijvva" and "demonstratijvalasj". There are two ways of adapting these adjectives, the adding of -lasj isn't okey, because that's a false derivation. But GG hasn't decided how these should be handled, so so far both ok. Looks like noun instead of adjective when adapted without the -lasj ending.  Attr is in weak grad, used in strong grad ass pred even thou this seems a little bit odd "Værbba l transitijvva". 


+A+OLang/NOB+CmpNP/Last: DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_CMP_INFL ;


LEXICON DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@   
                      
                        :Q1ladtj MEKANIHKALASJ_CMP_INFL  ;
                        :Q1      ATTR                    ;
                        :        N-EVENSTRONGSTEMadj     ;
                        :Q1      N-EVENWEAKSTEMadj       ; ! cg in nominal paradigm
      +Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:Q1t     ENDLEX                  ; ! Presumably WeG as adverb as well
                        :        MUORRACmp               ;

!                   +Sg+Nom:Q1lasj%>      ENDLEX            ;
!                          :Q1lasj%>      ATTR              ;
!          +Err/Orth+Sg+Ill:Q1ladtja%>j   ENDLEX            ;
!             +Err/Orth+Ess:Q1ladtja%>n   ENDLEX            ;
!                   +Sg+Ill:Q1lattja%>j   ENDLEX            ;
!                      +Ess:Q1lattja%>n   ENDLEX            ;
!                          :Q1lattja%>    N-EVENWEAKSTEMadj ;
!                          :Q1l%>         ABBO/AMOS         ;
!        +Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:Q1lattja%>t   ENDLEX            ;
!                +Cmp/SgNom:Q1lasj%>      R                 ;
!                +Cmp/SgGen:Q1lattja%>    R                 ;
!                +Cmp/PlGen:Q1lattja%>j   R                 ;
!          +Err/Orth+Sg+Nom:Q1ladtja%>    PxV               ; !
!          +Err/Orth+Sg+Ill:Q1ladtja%>s%> PxCi              ; !
!                   +Sg+Nom:Q1lattja%>    PxV               ; !
!                   +Sg+Ill:Q1lattja%>s%> PxCi              ; !
                   
! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: aktijvva # Even-syllable test
!!€ aktijva:                    aktijvva+A+Attr
!!€ aktijvalasj:                aktijvva+A+Attr
!!€ aktijvva:                   aktijvva+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ aktijvalasj:                aktijvva+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ aktijvalattjav:             aktijvva+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ aktijvalabbo:               aktijvva+A+Comp+Sg+Nom


LEXICON ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM !!= @CODE@ Same as DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM. Only for adjectives ending on -al. Words like digital,liberal, lokal.  Gives both "eksponentiálla" and "eksponentiálalasj". Different lexicon for these -al adjectives because of Err/Orth tags. OBS, "dialektal", is assimilated "dialevtalasj", and goes to lexicon MEKANIHKALASJ.

+A+OLang/NOB+CmpNP/Last: ÁLA_LASJ_INFL_CMP ;

LEXICON ÁLA_LASJ_INFL_CMP !!= @CODE@

                                 :álaladtj MEKANIHKALASJ_CMP_INFL  ;   
                        +Err/Orth:alaladtj MEKANIHKALASJ_CMP_INFL  ;   
                                 :áll            ÁLLA-ÆLLA         ;
                        +Err/Orth:all            ÁLLA-ÆLLA         ;
                        +Err/Orth:elºl           ÁLLA-ÆLLA         ;
                +Err/Orth+Area/NO:æ9lºl          ÁLLA-ÆLLA         ;
         +Err/Orth+Use/NG+Area/SE:ä9lºl          ÁLLA-ÆLLA         ;
           
!             +A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:álalasj%>      ENDLEX            ;
!                    +A+Err/Orth:álalasj%>      ATTR              ;
!                    +A+Err/Orth:álalattja%>    N-EVENWEAKSTEMadj ;
!                +A+Ess+Err/Orth:álalattja%>n   ENDLEX            ;
!       +A+Ess+Err/Orth+Err/Orth:álaladtja%>n   ENDLEX            ;
!             +A+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:álalattja%>j   ENDLEX            ;
!    +A+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth+Err/Orth:álaladtja%>j   ENDLEX            ;
!!                     +Err/Orth:álal%>         ABBO/AMOS         ;
!  +A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv+Err/Orth:álalattja%>t   ENDLEX            ;
!          +A+Cmp/SgNom+Err/Orth:álalasj%>      R                 ;
!          +A+Cmp/SgGen+Err/Orth:álalattja%>    R                 ;
!          +A+Cmp/PlGen+Err/Orth:álalattja%>j   R                 ;
!             +A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:álaladtja%>    PxV               ; ! Not possible with possesive suffixes, Case?
!             +A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:álalattja%>    PxV               ; ! Not possible with possesive suffixes, Case?
!             +A+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:álaladtja%>s%> PxCi              ; ! Not possible with possesive suffixes
!             +A+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:álalattja%>s%> PxCi              ; ! Not possible with possesive suffixes

LEXICON ELLA_LASJ_NO_NORM !!= @CODE@ Loanwords, same as ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM and DEMONSTRANTIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM. For NO and SE adjectives ending on -ell, eksperimentell, ideell, parallell. The short form is nom parallælla, attr, parallella The long form: paralellalasj, attr parallellalasj. Different lexicon for these -ell adjectives because of err/orth tags. OBS, "individuell", is assimilated "indivijdalasj", and goes to lexicon MEKANIHKALASJ.

+A+OLang/NOB+CmpNP/Last: ELLA_LASJ_INFL_CMP ;

LEXICON ELLA_LASJ_INFL_CMP !!= @CODE@ 

                       :ellaladtj MEKANIHKALASJ_CMP_INFL  ; 
                Area/NO:ælºl  ÁLLA-ÆLLA ;
         Use/NG+Area/SE:älºl  ÁLLA-ÆLLA ;
              +Err/Orth:áll   ÁLLA-ÆLLA ;
              +Err/Orth:elºl  ÁLLA-ÆLLA ;
