src/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Adjective
absurdda:absurdda DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
adversatijvva:adversatijvva DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
aggressijvva:ag^gressijvva DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
akuhtta:akuhtta DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
analåvggå+Err/Orth:analoga DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ;
anonijmma:anonijmma DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
aspektuálla:a^spektu^ ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! ! ^LOAN
audiovisuálla:audio#visu ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
auditijvva:auditijvva DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
autoritatijvva:autoritatijvva DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
bilabiálla:bilabi ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! ! ^LOAN
bilaterálla:bilater ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! ! ^LOAN
binormálla:binorm ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! ! ^LOAN
boreálla:bore^ ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
ceremoniælla+Area/SE:ceremoni^ælºla DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! ^LOAN !
definihtta:definihtta DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
depressijvva:depressijvva DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
destruktijvva:destruktijvva DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
deverbálla:deverb ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! ! ^LOAN
diagonálla:di^agon ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! ! ^LOAN
dialektálla:di^alekt ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! ! ^LOAN
digitálla:digit ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
dirækta:dirækta DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
ditransitijva:di^transitijvva DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
duplæksa:du^plæksa DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
effektijvva:effektijvva DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
eksperimentælla:eksperiment ELLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! ! ^LOAN
eksplisihtta:eks^plisihtta DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
eksponentiálla:eksponenti ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! ! ^LOAN
ekstensijvva:ekstensijvva DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
ekstriebma+Area/SE+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ekstrebma DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; !
elementærra:elementærºra DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! ^LOAN
federálla:feder ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! ! ^LOAN
fenomenálla:fenomen ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! ! ^LOAN
feodálla:fe^od ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! ! ^LOAN
fiktijvva:fiktijvva DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
formálla:form ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! ! ^LOAN
fysikálla:fysik ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! ! LOAN fysikk - fysihkka, fysikalsk -fysihkálla?
generælla:gener ELLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN 
geniálla:geni^ ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
geosentrálla:geo#sentr ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! ! LOAN
globálla+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:glob ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; !
glottálla:glott ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
grotæsska+Err/Orth:grotesska DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! ! ^LOAN
homogiedna+Area/NO:homogiedna DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ;
humanitærra:humanitærºra DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! ^LOAN
ideálla:ide^ ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ;
ideælla+Err/Orth:ide^elºla ELLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! ^LOAN 
ideælla:ide^ ELLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! ^LOAN 
iehpenormálla:iehpe#norm ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! ! LOAN
imaginærra:imaginærºra DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! ^LOAN
immanænnta:immanænnta DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! ^LOAN
immateriælla:immateri ELLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ;
impressijvva:im^pressijvva DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
indefinihtta:indefinihtta DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
individuálla:individu^ ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! ! ^LOAN
induktijvva:induktijvva DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
inkompetænnta+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Err/Orth:inkompetennta DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! ! ^LOAN !
inkonsekvænnta+Err/Orth:inkonsekvennta DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! ! ^LOAN
innovatijvva:innovatijvva DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
instruktijvva:instruktijvva DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
intellektuálla:intellektu^ ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! ! ^LOAN
intelligænnta:intelligænnta DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! ^LOAN
intertekstuálla:inter#tekstu^ ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! ^LOAN 
intænssa+Err/Orth:intenssa DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! ! ^LOAN
kardinálla:kardin ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
kommersiálla:kommersi^ ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! ^LOAN 
kommunikatijvva:kommunikatijvva DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
konsekvænnta+Err/Orth:konsekvennta DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! ! ^LOAN
konseptuálla:konseptu^ ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! ^LOAN 
kontroversiælla:kontroversi^ ELLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! ^LOAN 
koreferentiálla:koreferenti^ ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! ^LOAN 
korporatijvva:korporatijvva DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
kvantitatijvva:kvantitatijvva DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
legálla:leg ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
liberálla:liber ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
lokálla:lok ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
manuælla:manu ELLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ;
marginælla:margin ELLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN 
maritijmma:maritijmma DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
materiælla:materi ELLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ;
mediálla:medi^ ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
minimálla:minim ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
multimediálla:multimedi^ ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN 
narratijvva:narratijvva DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
naturælla:natur ELLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN 
neutrálla:neutr ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
normálla:norm ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
nukleærra:nukle^ærºra DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! ^LOAN
orientálla:orient ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
ortodoaksa+Err/Orth+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ortodoksa DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; !
paradoksálla:paradoks ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
paralælla:paral ELLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ;! ! ^LOAN
potentiálla:potenti ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! ! ^LOAN
preliminærra:preliminærºra DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! ^LOAN
prinsipiálla:prinsipi ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
produktijvva:produktijvva DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
prosessuálla:prosessu ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! ! ^LOAN
punktuálla:punktu ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! ! ^LOAN
reaksjonærra:re^aksjonærºra DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! ^LOAN
referentiálla:referenti ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
regálla:reg ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
rekursijvva:rekursijvva DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
reseptijvva:reseptijvva DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
reælla+Err/Orth:re^elºla ELLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! ! ^LOAN
reælla:re ELLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
seksuálla:seksu ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! ^LOAN
sekundærra:sekundærºra DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! ^LOAN
sentimentálla:sentiment ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
seremoniælla:seremoni ELLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
spesiálla:spesi ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
sterijlla:sterijlla DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
strukturælla:struktur ELLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
taktijlla:taktijlla DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
termálla:term ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
tribunálla:tribun ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
universálla:univers ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! LOAN
urálalasj+Err/Orth:urálla DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM ;
virtuálla:virtu ÁLA_LASJ_NO_NORM ; ! ! ^LOAN
